Washington statutes.
RCW 36.43.030

Enforcement—Inspectors.

The boards of county commissioners may appoint fire inspectors or other inspectors to enforce any building code or fire regulation adopted by them. The boards must enforce any building code or fire regulation adopted by them.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.43.030. Prior: 1943 c 204 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 4077-12.]